Maryland, session 2025, HB1068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
3–215.
(a) (1) For the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on consolidated
transportation bonds as they become due and payable, there is hereby levied and imposed
an annual tax that consists of the taxes specified in this section and, to the extent necessary
and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, that shall be used and applied
exclusively for that purpose.
(2) The required use and application of the tax under paragraph (1) of this
subsection is subject only to the prior use and application of one or all or any combination
of the taxes specified in this section to meet the debt service on all of the following bonds
while they are outstanding and unpaid and to the payment of which any part of those taxes
has been pledged:
(i) Bonds of prior issues; and
(ii) Bonds of any series of county transportation bonds issued under
Subtitle 3 of this title.
(b) The tax levied and imposed by this section consists of that part of the following
taxes that are retained to the credit of the Department after distributions to the political
subdivisions:
(1) The motor fuel tax revenue distributed under §§ 2–1103(2), 2–1103(3),
and 2–1104(a)(3) of the Tax – General Article;
(2) The motor fuel tax revenue attributable to the sales and use tax
equivalent rate imposed under § 9–306 of the Tax – General Article and distributed under
§ 2–1103(4) of the Tax – General Article;
(3) The income tax revenue distributed under § 2–614 of the Tax – General
Article;
(4) The excise tax imposed on vehicles by Part II of Title 13, Subtitle 8 of
this article;
(5) The sales and use tax revenues distributed under § 2–1302.1 of the Tax
– General Article; [and]
(6) The transportation network company impact fee revenues allocated
under § 3–216(d)(5)(i)1 of this subtitle; AND

HOUSE BILL 1068 3
(7) THE TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES OVERAGE ACCOUNT
REVENUES ALLOCATED UNDER § 3–216(D)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
3–216.
(a) There is a Transportation Trust Fund for the Department.
(c) (2) (i) The Gasoline and Motor Vehicle Revenue Account, the Driver
Education Account, the Motorcycle Safety Program Account, [and] the Transportation
Network Company Impact Fee Account, AND THE TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES
OVERAGE ACCOUNT shall be maintained in the Transportation Trust Fund.
(d) (6) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ALLOCATE THE FUNDS IN THE
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES OVERAGE ACCOUNT FOR THE FOLLOWING
PURPOSES, IN THE MANNER THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES APPROPRIATE:
(I) THE CONSTRUCTION AND MAINTENANCE OF STATE
HIGHWAYS THAT FEED VEHICULAR TRAFFIC TO A MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY TRANSPORTATION FACILITY; AND
(II) STATE HIGHWAY OR TRANSIT CONSTRUCTION OR
MAINTENANCE PROJECTS THAT:
1. RELIEVE TRAFFIC CONGESTION AT A MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY TRANSPORTATION FACILITY BY PROVIDING
ALTERNATIVE TRANSPORTATION OPTIONS FOR COMMUTERS AND CARGO; AND
2. ARE LOCATED IN THE GENERAL VICINITY OF A
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY TRANSPORTATION FACILITY.
4–312.
(a) (2) As to all or any part of any transportation facilities project, the
Authority may:
(i) Fix, revise, charge, and collect rentals, rates, fees, tolls, and other
charges and revenues for its use or for its services; and
(ii) Contract with any person who desires its use for any purpose and
fix the terms, conditions, rentals, rates, fees, tolls, or other charges or revenues for this use.
(b) The rentals, rates, fees, tolls, and other charges and revenues designated as
security for any bonds issued under this subtitle shall be fixed and adjusted from time to
time, either with respect to a particular transportation facilities project or in respect of the
aggregate of the charges and revenues from other transportation facilities projects under

HOUSE BILL 1068
the control of the Authority, as may be specified by law or in any applicable resolution or
trust agreement, so as to provide funds that, together with any other available revenues,
are sufficient as long as the bonds are outstanding and unpaid to:
(1) Pay the costs of maintaining, repairing, and operating the
transportation facilities project or projects financed in whole or in part by one or more series
of outstanding and unpaid bonds, to the extent that payment is not otherwise provided;
(2) Pay the principal of and the interest on these bonds as they become due
and payable;
(3) Create reasonable reserves that are anticipated will be needed for these
purposes; and
(4) Provide funds for paying the cost of replacements, renewals, and
improvements.
(B–1) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “NEAR OPTIMAL TOLL RATE” MEANS A TOLL RATE THAT
PROVIDES AT LEAST 95% OF THE MAXIMUM REVENUE POSSIBLE BASED ON A
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES PROJECT’S OPTIMAL TOLL RATE.
(III) “OPTIMAL TOLL RATE” MEANS A TOLL RATE FOR A
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES PROJECT THAT MAXIMIZES REVENUE, AS
DETERMINED BY THE AUTHORITY.
(2) THERE IS A TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES OVERAGE ACCOUNT
IN THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND.
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHALL:
(I) FIX, REVISE, CHARGE, AND COLLECT FEES, TOLLS, AND
OTHER CHARGES AT THE NEAR OPTIMAL TOLL RATE; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE REVENUE COLLECTED ABOVE THE AMOUNTS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION TO THE TRANSPORTATION
FACILITIES OVERAGE ACCOUNT IN THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND.
(4) (I) TO DETERMINE THE OPTIMAL TOLL RATE, THE AUTHORITY
SHALL CONSIDER:

HOUSE BILL 1068 5
1. MARKET FORCES, INCLUDING THE TYPES OF TRAFFIC
THAT USE A PARTICULAR TRANSPORTATION FACILITY, THE ELASTICITY OF DEMAND,
AND THE AVAILABILITY OF ALTERNATE ROUTES; AND
2. ASSESSING VARYING TOLL RATES BASED ON THE
TIME OF DAY, THE TIME OF YEAR, AND ANY ANTICIPATED WEEKEND AND HOLIDAY
TRAVEL.
(II) THE AUTHORITY SHALL CONSIDER:
1. OFFERING DISCOUNT RATES FOR SENIORS, DAILY
COMMUTERS, LOW–INCOME STATE RESIDENTS, MARYLAND E–ZPASS HOLDERS,
AND STATE RESIDENTS WHO LIVE IN THE VICINITY OF THE TRANSPORTATION
FACILITY; AND
2. THE DISCOUNT RATES OFFERED IN DETERMINING
THE NEAR OPTIMAL TOLL RATE.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the rentals, rates, fees,
tolls, and other charges and revenues are not subject to supervision or regulation by any
instrumentality, agency, or unit of this State or any of its political subdivisions.
(2) This subtitle does not permit the exercise of any power or the
undertaking of any activity that would conflict with the provisions and limitations of the
federal Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964.
(3) Tolls for the use of the bridge carrying the John F. Kennedy Memorial
Highway over the Susquehanna River may not be less than the comparable tolls charged
for the use of the Susquehanna River Bridge.
(4) Prior to fixing or revising tolls on any part of any transportation
facilities project, the Authority shall provide, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, Senate Finance
Committee, House Appropriations Committee, and House Ways and Means Committee
information on the proposed toll charges, including:
(i) The annual revenues generated by the toll charges;
(ii) The proposed use of the revenues; and
(iii) The proposed commuter discount rates.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE ANY REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES OVERAGE ACCOUNT IN THE TRANSPORTATION

HOUSE BILL 1068
TRUST FUND UNDER SUBSECTION (B–1) OF THIS SECTION AS AUTHORIZED UNDER §
3–216(D)(6) OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.